Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2023 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 735.530 to
735.552.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Carrier” has the meaning given that term in ORS 743B.005.
(b) “Manufacturer” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.689.
(c) “Prescription drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 646A.689.
(2) Not later than June 1 of each calendar year, a  pharmacy benefit manager registered
under ORS 735.532 shall file a report with the Department  of Consumer and Business Ser-
vices. The report must contain, for the  immediately preceding calendar year, the aggregated
dollar amount of rebates, fees, price protection payments and any other payments  the
pharmacy benefit manager received from manufacturers:
(a) Related to managing the pharmacy benefits  for carriers issuing health benefit plans
in this state; and
(b) That were:
(A) Passed  on to carriers issuing health benefit plans in this state or enrollees at the
point of sale of a prescription drug in this state; or
(B) Retained as revenue by the pharmacy benefit manager.
(3) The report described in subsection (2) of this section may not disclose:
(a) The identity of a carrier or an enrollee;
(b) The price charged for a specific prescription drug or class of drugs; or
(c) The amount of any rebate or fee provided  for a specific prescription drug or class of
prescription drugs.
(4) Information submitted to the department under  this section is confidential and not
subject to disclosure except as provided in subsection (5) of this section and ORS 705.137.
(5) Not later than October 1 of each calendar year, the department shall publish on  the
department’s website the aggregated data from all reports filed  by pharmacy benefit man-
agers under this section  for the preceding calendar year. The department shall publish the
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 1
data in a manner that does not disclose confidential  information of pharmacy benefit man-
agers.
SECTION 3. (1) The Prescription Drug Affordability Board  established in ORS 646A.693
shall develop a plan for establishing  upper payment limits on drugs sold in this state that
are subject to affordability reviews under ORS 646A.694. The plan shall include:
(a) A methodology for establishing upper payment limits;
(b) An analysis of the resources needed by the board to implement the plan;
(c) An analysis of how upper payment limits would be enforced; and
(d) An analysis of how upper payment limits could be implemented with respect to:
(A) Plans administered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board;
(B) Plans administered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board;
(C) Other state-administered health benefits;
(D) Health benefit plans, as defined in ORS 743B.005; and
(E) Other forms of insurance that provide pharmaceutical  benefits, to the extent per-
mitted by federal law.
(2) No later than September 15, 2024, the Prescription Drug Affordability Board shall  re-
port to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly  related to health, in the manner
provided in ORS 192.245, the following information:
(a) A detailed explanation of the plan developed under subsection (1) of this section.
(b) An analysis of  potential savings from or costs of implementing the plan with respect
to:
(A) The state;
(B) Insurers;
(C) Hospitals;
(D) Pharmacies; and
(E) Consumers.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 705.146 is amended to read:
705.146. The Prescription Drug  Affordability Account is established as a subaccount in the
Consumer and Business  Services Fund created in ORS 705.145, consisting of moneys collected under
ORS 646A.695 and moneys that may be appropriated for  deposit into the Prescription Drug
Affordability Account by the Legislative Assembly.  Interest earned on the account shall be credited
to the  account. Moneys in the account are continuously appropriated to the [ Prescription Drug
Affordability Board ] Department of  Consumer and Business Services  to carry out ORS 646A.693
to 646A.695.
SECTION 5.  ORS 646A.689 is amended to read:
646A.689. (1) As used in [ this section and ] ORS 646A.693 to 646A.695:
(a) “Drug” has the meaning given that term in ORS 689.005.
(b) “Health care facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(c) “Health care service contractor” has the meaning given that term in ORS 750.005.
(d)(A) “Manufacture” means:
(i) The  production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a drug,
either directly or  indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin or independently by
means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis; and
(ii) The packaging or repackaging of a drug or labeling or relabeling of a drug container.
(B) “Manufacture” does  not include the preparation or compounding of a drug by an individual
for the individual’s own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling of a drug:
(i) By a health care practitioner incidental to administering or  dispensing a drug in the course
of professional practice;
(ii) By  a health care practitioner or at the practitioner’s authorization and supervision for the
purpose of or incidental to research, teaching or chemical analysis activities and not for sale;
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 2
(iii) By a health care service contractor for dispensing to a  subscriber or delivery to a health
care facility or outpatient clinic owned or  operated by the health care service contractor or an af-
filiate of the health care service contractor;
(iv) By a centralized repackaging operation for distribution to subscribers of health  care service
contractors or to pharmacies, health care facilities or outpatient clinics operated by or  affiliated
with a health care service contractor; or
(v) By a health care facility for dispensing to a patient or other person.
(e) “Manufacturer” means a person that manufactures a prescription drug that is  sold in this
state.
(f) “New prescription  drug” has the meaning prescribed by the Department of Consumer and
Business Services by rule.
(g) “Patient assistance program” means a program that a  manufacturer offers to the general
public in which a consumer may reduce the consumer’s out-of-pocket costs  for prescription drugs
by using coupons or discount cards, receiving copayment assistance or by other means.
(h) “Prescription drug” means a drug that must:
(A) Under federal law, be labeled “Caution: Federal  law prohibits dispensing without pre-
scription” prior to being dispensed or delivered; or
(B) Under any applicable federal or state law or  regulation, be dispensed only by prescription
or restricted to use only by health care practitioners.
(i) “Price” means the wholesale acquisition cost as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1395w-3a(c)(6)(B).
(2) No later than March 15 of each year, a manufacturer shall report  the information described
in subsection (3) of this section to the department regarding each prescription drug for which:
(a) The price was $100 or more for a one-month supply or  for a course of treatment lasting less
than one month; and
(b) There was a  net increase of 10 percent or more in the price of the prescription drug de-
scribed in paragraph (a) of this subsection over the course of the previous calendar year.
(3) For each  prescription drug described in subsection (2) of this section, a manufacturer shall
report to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department:
(a) The name and price of the prescription  drug and the net increase, expressed as a percentage,
in the price of the drug over the course of the previous calendar year;
(b) The length of time the prescription drug has been on the market;
(c) The factors that contributed to the price increase;
(d) The name of any generic version of the prescription drug available on the market;
(e) The research  and development costs associated with the prescription drug that were paid
using public funds;
(f) The direct costs incurred by the manufacturer:
(A) To manufacture the prescription drug;
(B) To market the prescription drug;
(C) To distribute the prescription drug; and
(D) For ongoing safety and effectiveness research associated with the prescription drug;
(g) The total sales revenue for the prescription drug during the previous calendar year;
(h) The manufacturer’s profit attributable to the prescription drug during  the previous calendar
year;
(i) The introductory  price of the prescription drug when it was approved for marketing by the
United States  Food and Drug Administration and the net yearly increase, by calendar year, in the
price of the prescription drug during the previous five years;
(j) The 10 highest prices paid for the prescription drug during the previous calendar  year in any
country other than the United States;
(k) Any other information that the manufacturer deems  relevant to the price increase described
in subsection (2)(b) of this section; and
(L) The documentation necessary to support the information reported under this subsection.
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 3
(4) The  department may use any prescription drug price information the department deems ap-
propriate to verify that manufacturers have properly reported price increases  as required by sub-
sections (2) and (3) of this section.
(5) A  manufacturer shall accompany the report provided under subsection (2) of this section with
the following information about each patient  assistance program offered by the manufacturer to
consumers residing in this state for the  prescription drugs described in subsection (2) of this section:
(a) The number of consumers who participated in the program;
(b) The total value of the coupons, discounts,  copayment assistance or other reduction in costs
provided to consumers in this state who participated in the program;
(c) For each drug, the number of refills that qualify for the program, if applicable;
(d) If the program expires after a specified period of time, the period of time  that the program
is available to each consumer; and
(e) The eligibility criteria for the program and how eligibility is verified for accuracy.
(6) No later than 30 days  after a manufacturer introduces a new prescription drug for sale in
the United States at a price that exceeds the threshold established by the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid  Services  for specialty drugs in the Medicare Part D program, the manufacturer shall notify
the department,  in the form and manner prescribed by the department, of all the following informa-
tion:
(a) A description of the marketing used in the introduction of the new prescription drug;
(b) The methodology used to establish the price of the new prescription drug;
(c) Whether the United States Food and Drug Administration granted the new prescription drug
a breakthrough therapy designation or a priority review;
(d) If the  new prescription drug was not developed by the manufacturer, the date of and the
price paid for acquisition of the new prescription drug by the manufacturer;
(e) The manufacturer’s estimate of the average number of patients who will be  prescribed the
new prescription drug each month; and
(f) The research and development costs associated with the new prescription drug that were paid
using public funds.
(7)(a) After receiving the report or information described in subsection (2), (3), (5)  or (6) of this
section, the department may make a written request to the manufacturer for  supporting documen-
tation or additional information concerning the report. The department shall prescribe  by rule the
periods:
(A) Following the receipt of the report or information during which the department may  request
additional information; and
(B) Following a request by  the department for additional information during which a manufac-
turer may respond to the request.
(b) The department may extend the period prescribed under paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection,
as necessary, on a case-by-case basis.
(8) A manufacturer may be subject to a civil penalty, as provided in ORS 646A.692, for:
(a) Failing to submit timely reports or notices as required by this section;
(b) Failing to provide information required under this section;
(c) Failing to respond in a timely manner to a written request by the department for  additional
information under subsection (7) of this section; or
(d) Providing inaccurate or incomplete information under this section.
(9) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the department shall post to  its website
all of the following information:
(a) A list of the prescription drugs reported under subsection (2) of this section and the man-
ufacturers of those prescription drugs;
(b) Information reported to the department under subsections (3) and (5)  to (7) of this section;
and
(c) Written requests by the department for additional information  under subsection (7) of this
section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 4
(10)(a) The department  may not post to its website any information described in subsection (9)
of this section if:
(A) The  information is conditionally exempt from disclosure under ORS 192.345 as a trade se-
cret; and
(B) The public interest does not require disclosure of the information.
(b) If the department withholds any information from public disclosure pursuant to this  sub-
section, the department shall post to its website  a report describing the nature of the information
and the department’s basis for withholding the information from disclosure.
(c) A  person may petition the Attorney General, as provided in ORS 192.411, to review a deci-
sion by the department to withhold information pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(11) In  accordance with ORS 646A.694, the department shall provide to the Prescription Drug
Affordability Board established in ORS 646A.693:
(a) Each calendar quarter, a list of prescription drugs  included in reports submitted under sub-
sections (2) and (6) of this section; and
(b) Access to pricing information  submitted to the department under subsections (3), (6) and (7)
of this section.
(12) The department  shall make available to consumers, online and by telephone, a process for
consumers to notify the department about an increase in the  price of a prescription drug.  Any
personally identifiable information about a consumer included in a notification provided to
the department under this subsection, such as a consumer’s name, address, telephone num-
ber or electronic mail address, is confidential and not subject to disclosure under ORS 192.311
to 192.478.
(13) The department  may adopt rules as necessary for carrying out the provisions of this
section[ , including but not limited to rules  establishing fees to be paid by manufacturers to be used
solely to pay the costs of the department in carrying out the provisions of this section ].
(14) No later than December 15  of each year, the department shall compile and report the in-
formation collected by the department under this section to the interim committees of the Legisla-
tive Assembly related to health. The report shall include  recommendations for legislative changes,
if any, to contain the cost of prescription drugs and reduce the impact of price increases on  con-
sumers, the Department of Corrections,  the Public Employees’ Benefit Board, the Oregon Health
Authority, the Department  of Human Services, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board and health in-
surance premiums in the commercial market.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 646A.693 is amended to read:
646A.693. (1) The Prescription Drug  Affordability Board is established in the Department of
Consumer and Business Services to protect residents  of this state, state and local governments,
commercial health plans, health care providers, pharmacies licensed in this state and  other
stakeholders within the health care system in this state from the high costs of prescription drugs.
(2) The board consists of [ five] eight members [ and three alternates ] appointed by the  Governor.
(3) The term of office of each member of the board is four years, but a  member serves at the
pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of the term  of a member, the Governor shall appoint
a successor whose term begins on January 1 next following. A member is  eligible for reappointment.
If there is a vacancy for any cause, the Governor shall make  an appointment to become immediately
effective for the unexpired term.
(4) The appointment of each member of the board is  subject to confirmation by the Senate in the
manner prescribed in ORS 171.562 and 171.565.
(5) A member of the board is entitled to compensation and expenses as provided in  ORS 292.495.
(6) The members of the board must be residents of this state with  expertise in health care eco-
nomics and clinical medicine.
(7) A member of  the board may not be an employee of, a board member of or a consultant to a
manufacturer or a trade association of manufacturers.
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 5
(8) The board shall select one of its members  as chairperson and another as vice chairperson,
for terms and with duties and powers necessary for the performance of  the functions of the offices
as the board determines.
(9) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for the  transaction of business.
(10) The  department shall appoint an executive director for the board, may employ consultants,
investigators or other staff and shall provide staff support to the board to carry out its duties.
(11) The board shall meet at least once every six weeks at a  time and place determined by the
chairperson. The chairperson may cancel or postpone a regular meeting if there is no prescription
drug to review. The board may also meet  at other times and places specified by the call of the
chairperson or of a majority of the members of the board.
(12)(a) The following actions by the board shall be open to the public in accordance with  ORS
192.610 to 192.690:
(A) Any deliberation on whether to conduct an affordability review of a prescription drug under
ORS [ 646A.695] 646A.694; and
(B) Any decision or deliberation toward a decision  on any matter before the board except as
provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b) The board may meet in executive session to discuss trade secret information.
(13) The board shall:
(a) Provide public notice of each board meeting at least two weeks in advance of the meeting;
(b) Make materials for each board meeting available  to the public at least one week in advance
of the meeting;
(c) Provide an opportunity for public comment at each open meeting of the board; and
(d) Provide the public with the opportunity to submit written comments on any  pending decision
of the board.
(14) The board may allow expert testimony at board meetings, including  when the board meets
in executive session.
(15)(a) A member of the board shall recuse the member from decisions related to a prescription
drug if the member, or an immediate family member of  the member, has received or could receive
any of the following:
(A) A direct financial  benefit of any amount deriving from the result or finding of a study, re-
view or determination by or for the board; or
(B) A financial benefit from any person that owns, manufactures, or provides prescription  drugs,
services or items to be reviewed by the board that in the aggregate exceeds $5,000 per year.
(b) For the  purposes of paragraph (a) of this subsection, a financial benefit includes honoraria,
fees, stock, the value of the member’s or immediate family member’s stock holdings and  any direct
financial benefit deriving from the result or finding of a  study, review or determination by or for the
board.
(c) A conflict of interest shall be disclosed:
(A) By the board when hiring board staff;
(B) By the Governor when appointing members [ and alternate members ] to the board; and
(C) By the board, when a member of  the board is recused in any final decision resulting from
a review of a prescription drug.
(d) A conflict of interest shall be disclosed at the earlier of:
(A) Prior to the first board meeting after the conflict is identified; or
(B) Within five days after the conflict is identified.
(e) A conflict of interest disclosed under this section shall be posted on the  website of the board
unless the chairperson of the board recuses the member from any final decision  resulting from a
review of a prescription drug.
(f) A posting under paragraph (e) of this subsection  shall include the type, nature and magnitude
of the conflict of interest of the member involved.
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 6
(16) Members [ and alternate members ] of the board, staff and third  parties that contract with the
board may not accept  any gift or donation of services or property that creates a potential conflict
of interest or has the appearance of biasing the work of the board.
(17)(a) The board may enter into a contract  with a qualified, independent third party for any
service necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the board.
(b) Unless permission  is granted by the board, a third party hired by the board may not release,
publish or otherwise use any information to which the third party has access under its contract.
(18) In accordance with applicable provisions of  ORS chapter 183, the board may adopt rules
necessary for the administration of ORS 646A.693 to 646A.695.
SECTION 7.  Section 9, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  Notwithstanding the term of office specified by section 1 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 598,
Oregon Laws 2021, of the members first appointed to the Prescription Drug Affordability Board:
(1) [ One member and  one alternate ] Two members  shall serve for a term ending December 31,
2024.
(2) [Two] Three members [ and one alternate ] shall serve for a term ending December 31, 2025.
(3) [ Two] Three members, including the chairperson, [ and one alternate ] shall serve  for a term
ending December 31, 2026.
SECTION 8.  ORS 646A.694 is amended to read:
646A.694. (1) The Department of Consumer and Business  Services shall provide to the Pre-
scription Drug Affordability Board each calendar quarter a list of prescription  drugs included in
reports submitted to the department under ORS 646A.689 (2) and  (6), a list of drugs included in re-
ports submitted to the  department under ORS 646A.683 and 743.025 and a list of insulin drugs
marketed in this state during the previous calendar year. Each calendar year, the board shall
identify nine drugs and at least one insulin product from  the lists provided under this subsection
that the board  determines may create affordability challenges for health care systems or high out-
of-pocket costs for patients in this state based on criteria  adopted by the board by rule, including
but not limited to:
(a) Whether the prescription drug has led to health inequities in communities of color;
(b) The number of residents in this state prescribed the prescription drug;
(c) The price for the prescription drug sold in this state;
(d) The estimated average  monetary price concession, discount or rebate the manufacturer pro-
vides to health insurance plans in this state  or is expected to provide to health insurance plans in
this state, expressed as a percentage of the price for the prescription drug under review;
(e) The estimated total amount of the price concession, discount or  rebate the manufacturer
provides to each pharmacy benefit manager registered in this state  for the prescription drug under
review, expressed as a percentage of the prices;
(f) The estimated price for therapeutic alternatives to the drug that are sold in this state;
(g) The estimated average price concession,  discount or rebate the manufacturer provides or is
expected to provide to health insurance plans and pharmacy benefit managers in this  state for
therapeutic alternatives;
(h) The estimated costs to health insurance plans based on patient use of the drug consistent
with the labeling approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration and recognized
standard medical practice;
(i) The impact on patient access to the drug considering standard  prescription drug benefit de-
signs in health insurance plans offered in this state;
(j) The  relative financial impacts to health, medical or social services costs as can be quantified
and compared to the costs of existing therapeutic alternatives;
(k) The estimated average patient copayment  or other cost-sharing for the prescription drug in
this state;
(L) Any information a manufacturer chooses to provide; and
(m) Any other factors as determined by the board in rules adopted by the board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 7
(2) A drug that is designated by the Secretary of the United States Food and  Drug Adminis-
tration, under 21 U.S.C. 360bb, as a drug for a rare disease or condition is  not subject to review
under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The board  shall accept testimony from patients and caregivers affected by a condition or
disease that is treated by a prescription drug under review by  the board and from individuals with
scientific or medical training with respect to the disease or condition.
(4)(a) If the board considers the cost-effectiveness of a prescription drug in  criteria adopted by
the board under subsection (1) of  this section, the board may not use quality-adjusted life-years, or
similar formulas that take into account a patient’s age or severity of illness or disability, to identify
subpopulations for which a prescription drug would be  less cost-effective. For any prescription drug
that extends life, the board’s analysis of cost-effectiveness must weigh  the value of the quality of life
equally for all patients, regardless of the patients’ age or severity of illness or disability.
(b) As used in this subsection:
(A) “Health utility” means a measure of the degree to which having a particular  form of disease
or disability or having particular functional limitations negatively  impacts the quality of life as
compared to a state of perfect health, expressed as a number between zero and one.
(B) “Quality-adjusted life-year” is the product of a health utility multiplied by the  extra months
or years of life that a patient might gain as a result of a treatment.
(5) To the extent practicable, the board shall access pricing information for prescription drugs
by:
(a) Accessing pricing information collected by the department under ORS 646A.689  and 743.025;
(b) Accessing data reported to the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 442.373;
(c) Entering into a memorandum of understanding  with another state to which manufacturers
already report pricing information; and
(d) Accessing other publicly available pricing information.
(6) The information used to conduct an affordability review may include any document and  re-
search related to the introductory price or price increase of a prescription drug, including life  cycle
management, net average price in this state, market competition and context, projected  revenue and
the estimated value or cost-effectiveness of the prescription drug.
(7) The department and the board shall  keep strictly confidential any information collected, used
or relied upon for the review conducted under this section if the information is:
(a) Information submitted to the department by a manufacturer under ORS 646A.689; and
(b) Confidential, proprietary or a trade secret as defined in ORS 192.345.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 646A.695 is amended to read:
646A.695. (1) The Department of Consumer  and Business Services shall adopt by rule, in con-
sultation with the Prescription Drug Affordability  Board, annual fees to be paid by manufacturers
[that sell ] of  prescription drugs  that are sold  in this state. The fees shall be established in amounts
necessary to meet the costs of the department [ and the board ] in administering ORS 646A.693  to
646A.695. [The fees shall be imposed based on a manufacturer’s share of gross revenue from sales of
prescription drugs in this state. ]
(2) Fees collected under this  section shall be deposited in the Prescription Drug Affordability
Account established in ORS 705.146.
SECTION 10.  ORS 743.025 is amended to read:
743.025. (1) As used in this section, “health  benefit plan” has the meaning given that term
in ORS 743B.005.
[(1)] (2)  An insurer shall [ include with any filing under ORS 743.018 ] annually report  the fol-
lowing information  to the Department of Consumer and Business Services, in  the form and
manner prescribed by the department,  regarding drugs reimbursed by the  insurer under [ policies
or certificates ] health benefit plans  issued  by the insurer  in this state:
(a) The 25 most frequently prescribed drugs;
(b) The 25 most costly drugs as a portion of total annual spending;
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 8
(c) The 25 drugs that have caused the greatest increase in total plan spending from one year
to the next; and
(d) The impact of the costs of prescription drugs on premium rates.
[(2)] (3)  The department  [ of Consumer and Business Services ] shall conduct a public hearing
annually on prescription  drug prices, information reported to the department under ORS 646A.689
and information described in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section.
[(3)] (4)  The department shall  regularly update the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly related to health on the information described in subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section.
[(4)] (5) Subsection [ (1)] (2) of this section applies to an insurer that issues [ policies or certificates
of health insurance ] health benefit plans  for sale in this state that include a  prescription drug
benefit.
SECTION 11. ORS 646A.680, 646A.683, 646A.686, 646A.689, 646A.692, 646A.696 and 646A.697
are added to and made a part of ORS 646A.693 to 646A.695.
SECTION 12. This 2023 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2023
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate June 20, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 192 (SB 192-B) Page 9